Missouri, session 2026, HB2504.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.665, 571.107, 571.215, 590.010, and 590.205, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.665,
571.107, 571.215, 590.010, and 590.205, to read as follows:
160.665. 1. Any school district within the state may designate one or more
elementary or secondary school teachers [or], administrators, or other school personnel as a
school protection officer. The responsibilities and duties of a school protection officer are
voluntary and shall be in addition to the normal responsibilities and duties of the teacher [or],
administrator, or other designated school personnel. Any compensation for additional
duties relating to service as a school protection officer shall be funded by the local school
district, with no state funds used for such purpose.
2. Any person designated by a school district as a school protection officer shall be
authorized to carry concealed firearms or a self-defense spray device in any school in the
district. A self-defense spray device shall mean any device that is capable of carrying, and
that ejects, releases, or emits, a nonlethal solution capable of incapacitating a violent threat.
The school protection officer shall not be permitted to allow any firearm or device out of [his
or her] the officer's personal control while that firearm or device is on school property. Any
school protection officer who violates this subsection may be removed immediately [from the
classroom] and subject to employment termination proceedings.
3. A school protection officer has the same authority to detain or use force against any
person on school property as provided to any other person under chapter 563.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2504 2
4. Upon detention of a person under subsection 3 of this section, the school protection
officer shall immediately notify a school administrator and a school resource officer, if such
officer is present at the school. If the person detained is a student then the parents or
guardians of the student shall also be immediately notified by a school administrator.
5. Any person detained by a school protection officer shall be turned over to a school
administrator or law enforcement officer as soon as practically possible and shall not be
detained by a school protection officer for more than one hour.
6. Any teacher [or], administrator, or other school personnel of an elementary or
secondary school who seeks to be designated as a school protection officer shall request such
designation in writing, and submit it to the superintendent of the school district [which] that
employs [him or her as a teacher or administrator] such individual. Along with this request,
any teacher [or], administrator, or other school personnel seeking to carry a concealed
firearm on school property shall also submit proof that [he or she] such individualhas a valid
concealed carry endorsement or permit, and all teachers [and], administrators, and other
school personnel seeking the designation of school protection officer shall submit a
certificate of school protection officer training program completion from a training program
approved by the director of the department of public safety which demonstrates that such
person has successfully completed the training requirements established by the POST
commission under chapter 590 for school protection officers.
7. A school district may require all designated personnel to provide a letter from
a licensed mental health professional certifying that they are fit for duty to carry out the
responsibilities of being a school protection officer.
8. No school district may designate a teacher [or], administrator, or other school
personnel as a school protection officer unless such person has successfully completed a
school protection officer training program, which has been approved by the director of the
department of public safety. No school district shall allow a school protection officer to carry
a concealed firearm on school property unless the school protection officer has a valid
concealed carry endorsement or permit.
[8.] 9. (1) Any school district that designates a teacher [or], administrator, or other
school personnelas a school protection officer shall, within thirty days, notify, in writing, the
director of the department of public safety of the designation, which shall include the
following:
[(1)] (a) The full name, date of birth, and address of the officer;
[(2)] (b) The name of the school district; and
[(3)] (c) The date such person was designated as a school protection officer.

HCS HB 2504 3
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any identifying
information collected under the authority of this subsection shall not be considered public
information and shall not be subject to a request for public records made under chapter 610.
[9.] 10. A school district may revoke the designation of a person as a school
protection officer for any reason and shall immediately notify the designated school
protection officer in writing of the revocation. The school district shall also within thirty days
of the revocation notify the director of the department of public safety in writing of the
revocation of the designation of such person as a school protection officer. A person who has
had the designation of school protection officer revoked has no right to appeal the revocation
decision.
[10.] 11. The director of the department of public safety shall maintain a listing of all
persons designated by school districts as school protection officers and shall make this list
available to all law enforcement agencies.
[11.] 12. Before a school district may designate a teacher [or],administrator, or other
school personnel as a school protection officer, the school board shall hold a public hearing
on whether to allow such designation. Notice of the hearing shall be published at least fifteen
days before the date of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or
county in which the school district is located. The board may determine at a closed meeting,
as "closed meeting" is defined under section 610.010, whether to authorize the designated
school protection officer to carry a concealed firearm or a self-defense spray device.
571.107. 1. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121,
a valid concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed carry
endorsement or permit issued by another state or political subdivision of another state shall
authorize the person in whose name the permit or endorsement is issued to carry concealed
firearms on or about [his or her] the individual's person or vehicle throughout the state. No
concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, valid concealed carry
endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed carry endorsement or permit
issued by another state or political subdivision of another state shall authorize any person to
carry concealed firearms into:
(1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or station without the consent of the
chief law enforcement officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of a firearm in a
vehicle on the premises of the office or station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on any election day. Possession of a
firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal offense so
long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
premises;

HCS HB 2504 4
(3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or correctional institution, prison or
jail. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile detention, or
correctional institution, prison or jail shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit, appellate or supreme court, or any
courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries or other rooms of any such court whether or not
such court solely occupies the building in question. This subdivision shall also include, but
not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court offices, any room or office wherein
any of the courts or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily conducting any business
within the jurisdiction of such courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner as
may be specified by supreme court rule pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of subsection
2 of section 571.030 while within their jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section 571.030, or such other persons who
serve in a law enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by supreme court rule
pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection from carrying a concealed firearm within any of
the areas described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of
any of the areas listed in this subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of local government; or any meeting
of the general assembly or a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in this
subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding a valid concealed carry permit or
endorsement from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body of which [he or she]
such individual is a member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not
be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a member of
the general assembly, a full-time employee of the general assembly employed under Section
17, Article III, Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees of the general assembly as
determined under section 21.155, or statewide elected officials and their employees, holding a
valid concealed carry permit or endorsement, from carrying a concealed firearm in the state
capitol building or at a meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general assembly or
a committee thereof, that is held in the state capitol building;
(6) The general assembly, supreme court, county or municipality may by rule,
administrative regulation, or ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed firearms by
permit or endorsement holders in that portion of a building owned, leased or controlled by
that unit of government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed
firearms is prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to

HCS HB 2504 5
the restricted area. The statute, rule or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public
housing by private persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings
owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying
or possession of a firearm. The statute, rule or ordinance shall not specify any criminal
penalty for its violation but may specify that persons violating the statute, rule or ordinance
may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to leave the building and if employees of the
unit of government, be subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of
the statute, rule or ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other
unit of government;
(7) Any establishment licensed to dispense intoxicating liquor for consumption on the
premises, which portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the consent of the
owner or manager. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any bona fide restaurant
open to the general public having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and that
receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual income from the dining facilities by the
sale of food. This subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises of the establishment and shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this
subdivision authorizes any individual who has been issued a concealed carry permit or
endorsement to possess any firearm while intoxicated;
(8) Any area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons
and property. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the airport shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is prohibited by federal law;
(10) Any higher education institution or elementary or secondary school facility
without the consent of the governing body of the higher education institution or a school
official or the district school board, unless the person with the concealed carry endorsement or
permit is a teacher [or], administrator, or other school personnel of an elementary or
secondary school who has been designated by [his or her] such individual's school district as
a school protection officer and is carrying a firearm in a school within that district, in which
case no consent is required. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any higher
education institution or elementary or secondary school facility shall not be a criminal offense
so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on
the premises;
(11) Any portion of a building used as a child care facility without the consent of the
manager. Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care facility in a

HCS HB 2504 6
family home from owning or possessing a firearm or a concealed carry permit or
endorsement;
(12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by the public without the consent
of the owner or manager pursuant to rules promulgated by the gaming commission.
Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling operation shall
not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
while the vehicle is on the premises;
(13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on
100 the premises of the amusement park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
101 not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
102 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship without the consent of the
103 minister or person or persons representing the religious organization that exercises control
104 over the place of religious worship. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
105 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
106 while the vehicle is on the premises;
107 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-limits to
108 concealed firearms by means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
109 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in letters of not
110 less than one inch. The owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private business
111 enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or person may prohibit persons holding a
112 concealed carry permit or endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the premises and
113 may prohibit employees, not authorized by the employer, holding a concealed carry permit or
114 endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the property of the employer. If the
115 building or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the business enterprise shall
116 post signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed firearm is prohibited. Possession
117 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
118 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. An
119 employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding a concealed carry permit or
120 endorsement from carrying a concealed firearm in vehicles owned by the employer;
121 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating capacity of five thousand or more.
122 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as
123 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
124 premises;
125 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
126 premises of a hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
127 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises.

HCS HB 2504 7
128 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location specified in subdivisions (1) to (17)
129 of subsection 1 of this section by any individual who holds a concealed carry permit issued
130 pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
131 August 28, 2013, shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to denial to the
132 premises or removal from the premises. If such person refuses to leave the premises and a
133 peace officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed
134 one hundred dollars for the first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation occurs
135 within a six-month period, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed two hundred
136 dollars and [his or her] such individual's permit, and, if applicable, endorsement to carry
137 concealed firearms shall be suspended for a period of one year. If a third citation for a similar
138 violation is issued within one year of the first citation, such person shall be fined an amount
139 not to exceed five hundred dollars and shall have [his or her] such individual's concealed
140 carry permit, and, if applicable, endorsement revoked and such person shall not be eligible for
141 a concealed carry permit for a period of three years. Upon conviction of charges arising from
142 a citation issued pursuant to this subsection, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county
143 which issued the concealed carry permit, or, if the person is a holder of a concealed carry
144 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county
145 which issued the certificate of qualification for a concealed carry endorsement and the
146 department of revenue. The sheriff shall suspend or revoke the concealed carry permit or, if
147 applicable, the certificate of qualification for a concealed carry endorsement. If the person
148 holds an endorsement, the department of revenue shall issue a notice of such suspension or
149 revocation of the concealed carry endorsement and take action to remove the concealed carry
150 endorsement from the individual's driving record. The director of revenue shall notify the
151 licensee that [he or she] the licensee must apply for a new license pursuant to chapter 302
152 which does not contain such endorsement. The notice issued by the department of revenue
153 shall be mailed to the last known address shown on the individual's driving record. The
154 notice is deemed received three days after mailing.
571.215. 1. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit issued under
sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall authorize the person in whose name the permit is issued to
carry concealed firearms on or about [his or her] the individual's person or vehicle
throughout the state. No Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall authorize
any person to carry concealed firearms into:
(1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or station without the consent of the
chief law enforcement officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of a firearm in a
vehicle on the premises of the office or station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;

HCS HB 2504 8
(2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on any election day. Possession of a
firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal offense so
long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
premises;
(3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or correctional institution, prison or
jail. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile detention, or
correctional institution, prison or jail shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit, appellate or supreme court, or any
courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries, or other rooms of any such court whether or not
such court solely occupies the building in question. This subdivision shall also include, but
not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court offices, any room or office wherein
any of the courts or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily conducting any business
within the jurisdiction of such courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner as
may be specified by supreme court rule under subdivision (6) of this subsection. Nothing in
this subdivision shall preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
section 571.030 while within their jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section 571.030, or such other persons who
serve in a law enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by supreme court rule
under subdivision (6) of this subsection from carrying a concealed firearm within any of the
areas described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of
any of the areas listed in this subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of local government, or any meeting
of the general assembly or a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in this
subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding a valid Missouri lifetime or
extended concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body
ofwhich [he or she] such individualis a member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle
or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude
a member of the general assembly, a full-time employee of the general assembly employed
under Section 17, Article III, Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees of the general
assembly as determined under section 21.155, or statewide elected officials and their
employees, holding a valid Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit, from
carrying a concealed firearm in the state capitol building or at a meeting whether of the full
body of a house of the general assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state
capitol building;

HCS HB 2504 9
(6) The general assembly, supreme court, county, or municipality may by rule,
administrative regulation, or ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed firearms by
permit holders in that portion of a building owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of
government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed firearms is
prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted
area. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public housing by
private persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings owned, leased, or
controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying or possession of a
firearm. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation
but may specify that persons violating the statute, rule, or ordinance may be denied entrance
to the building, ordered to leave the building and if employees of the unit of government, be
subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of the statute, rule, or
ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other unit of government;
(7) Any establishment licensed to dispense intoxicating liquor for consumption on the
premises, which portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the consent of the
owner or manager. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any bona fide restaurant
open to the general public having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and that
receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual income from the dining facilities by the
sale of food. This subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises of the establishment and shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this
subdivision authorizes any individual who has been issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit to possess any firearm while intoxicated;
(8) Any area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons
and property. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the airport shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is prohibited by federal law;
(10) Any higher education institution or elementary or secondary school facility
without the consent of the governing body of the higher education institution or a school
official or the district school board, unless the person with the Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit is a teacher [or], administrator, or other school personnel of an
elementary or secondary school who has been designated by [his or her] such individual's
school district as a school protection officer and is carrying a firearm in a school within that
district, in which case no consent is required. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises of any higher education institution or elementary or secondary school facility shall

HCS HB 2504 10
not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
while the vehicle is on the premises;
(11) Any portion of a building used as a child care facility without the consent of the
manager. Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care facility in a
family home from owning or possessing a firearm or a Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit;
(12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by the public without the consent
of the owner or manager under rules promulgated by the gaming commission. Possession of
a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling operation shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on
the premises of the amusement park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(14) Any church or other place of religious worship without the consent of the
minister or person or persons representing the religious organization that exercises control
100 over the place of religious worship. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
101 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
102 while the vehicle is on the premises;
103 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-limits to
104 concealed firearms by means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
105 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in letters of not
106 less than one inch. The owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private business
107 enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or person may prohibit persons holding a
108 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed firearms on the
109 premises and may prohibit employees, not authorized by the employer, holding a Missouri
110 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed firearms on the property
111 of the employer. If the building or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the
112 business enterprise shall post signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed firearm is
113 prohibited. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal
114 offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle
115 is on the premises. An employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding a Missouri
116 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm in vehicles
117 owned by the employer;
118 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating capacity of five thousand or more.
119 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as

HCS HB 2504 11
120 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
121 premises;
122 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
123 premises of a hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
124 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises.
125 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location specified in subdivisions (1) to (17)
126 of subsection 1 of this section by any individual who holds a Missouri lifetime or extended
127 concealed carry permit shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to denial to the
128 premises or removal from the premises. If such person refuses to leave the premises and a
129 peace officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed
130 one hundred dollars for the first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation occurs
131 within a six-month period, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed two hundred
132 dollars and [his or her] such individual's permit to carry concealed firearms shall be
133 suspended for a period of one year. If a third citation for a similar violation is issued within
134 one year of the first citation, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred
135 dollars and shall have [his or her] such individual's Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
136 carry permit revoked and such person shall not be eligible for a Missouri lifetime or extended
137 concealed carry permit or a concealed carry permit issued under sections 571.101 to 571.121
138 for a period of three years. Upon conviction of charges arising from a citation issued under
139 this subsection, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county which issued the Missouri
140 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit. The sheriff shall suspend or revoke the Missouri
141 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit.
590.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", when not obviously referring to the POST commission, means a
grant of authority to act as a peace officer;
(2) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of public safety or [his or her]
the director's designated agent or representative;
(3) "Peace officer", a law enforcement officer of the state or any political subdivision
of the state with the power of arrest for a violation of the criminal code or declared or deemed
to be a peace officer by state statute;
(4) "POST commission", the peace officer standards and training commission;
(5) "Reserve peace officer", a peace officer who regularly works less than thirty hours
per week;
(6) "School protection officer", an elementary or secondary school teacher [or],
administrator, or other school personnel who has been designated as a school protection
officer by a school district.

HCS HB 2504 12
590.205. 1. The POST commission shall establish minimum standards for school
protection officer training instructors, training centers, and training programs.
2. The director shall develop and maintain a list of approved school protection officer
training instructors, training centers, and training programs. The director shall not place any
instructor, training center, or training program on its approved list unless such instructor,
training center, or training program meets all of the POST commission requirements under
this section and section 590.200. The director shall make this approved list available to every
school district in the state. The required training to become a school protection officer shall
be provided by those firearm instructors, private and public, who have successfully completed
a department of public safety POST certified law enforcement firearms instructor school.
3. Each person seeking entrance into a school protection officer training center or
training program shall submit a fingerprint card and authorization for a criminal history
background check to include the records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the training
center or training program where such person is seeking entrance. The training center or
training program shall cause a criminal history background check to be made and shall cause
the resulting report to be forwarded to the school district where the elementary or secondary
school teacher [or], administrator, or other school personnel is seeking to be designated as a
school protection officer.
4. No person shall be admitted to a school protection officer training center or
training program unless such person submits proof to the training center or training program
that [he or she] such individual has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit.
5. A certificate of school protection officer training program completion may be
issued to any applicant by any approved school protection officer training instructor. On the
certificate of program completion the approved school protection officer training instructor
shall affirm that the individual receiving instruction has taken and passed a school protection
officer training program that meets the requirements of this section and section 590.200 and
indicate whether the individual has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit. The
instructor shall also provide a copy of such certificate to the director of the department of
public safety.
✔